Utah statutes.
32A-7-104.   Commission and department duties before granting permits.
(1) (a)  Before any single event permit may be granted by the commission, the
department shall:
(i)  conduct an investigation;
(ii)  gather information; and
(iii)  make recommendations to the commission as to whether or not a permit
should be granted.
(b)  The department shall forward the information and recommendations
described in Subsection (1)(a) to the commission to aid in the commission's
determination.
(2)  Before granting any single event permit, the commission shall:
(a)  determine that the applicant has complied with all basic qualifications
and requirements as provided by Sections 32A-7-102 and 32A-7-103;
(b)  determine that the application is complete;
(c)  consider the purpose of the organization or its local lodge, chapter, or
other local unit;
(d)  consider the times, dates, location, estimated attendance, nature, and
purpose of the event;
(e)  to minimize the risk of minors being sold or furnished alcohol or adults
being overserved alcohol at the event, assess the adequacy of control measures
for:
(i)  a large-scale public event where the estimated attendance is in excess of
1,000 people; or
(ii)  for an outdoor public event; and
(f)  consider any other factors or circumstances the commission considers
necessary.
(3) (a)  The commission shall determine the maximum amount that may be charged
by a permittee for an alcoholic beverage, including any set-up fee or other
charge.
(b)  The maximum amount that may be charged shall be set forth in the permit.
(4)  Upon commission approval of any application and upon the granting of a
single event permit, the department shall send copies of the approved
application and the permit to state and local law enforcement authorities
before the scheduled event.
